Utah statutes.
78B-14-801.   Grounds for rendition.
(1)  For purposes of this part, "governor" includes an individual performing
the functions of governor or the executive authority of a state covered by
this chapter.
(2)  The governor of this state may:
(a)  demand that the governor of another state surrender an individual found
in the other state who is charged criminally in this state with having failed
to provide for the support of an obligee; or
(b)  on the demand of the governor of another state, surrender an individual
found in this state who is charged criminally in the other state with having
failed to provide for the support of an obligee.
(3)  A provision for extradition of individuals not inconsistent with this
chapter applies to the demand even if the individual whose surrender is
demanded was not in the demanding state when the crime was allegedly committed
and has not fled therefrom.
